Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2219
Area agencies on aging; chief executive officer and staff; qualifications; personnel policies.

Each area agency on aging governing unit shall establish minimum qualifications of education, training, and experience for its chief executive officer and written policies and procedures for the selection, appointment, and annual performance rating of its chief executive officer and staff.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 19;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 21.